Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2009YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 82 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Radon mitigation 1 requirements. 2 The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state building 3 code a requirement that new single-family or two-family 4 residential construction must include passive methods for the 5 mitigation of radon. The requirement shall only apply to 6 single-family or two-family residential construction commenced 7 after the adoption of the requirement. 8